Hawaii, session 2026, HB1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established an intensive mobile team pilot program within the adult mental health division of the department of health to provide intensive mobile team services, also known as "street psychiatry", to chronically houseless individuals suffering from serious brain disorders, including but not limited to schizophrenia and schizoaffective disorder. (b) The pilot program shall establish one intensive mobile team in the community mental health center system. (c) The intensive mobile team shall: (1)  Establish criteria for pilot program participation, which shall include being houseless and suffering from a serious brain disorder, prioritizing individuals with schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder; (2)  Manage at least forty participants, who shall be vetted and enrolled by the intensive mobile team; (3)  Offer after-hour services, including: (A)  Responding to crises; (B)  Visiting emergency rooms; and (C)  If and when participants are arrested, meeting with law enforcement and participants at the receiving desk or similar place where the participant is being held in custody to share information on their participation in the pilot program; (4)  Determine, in collaboration with area hospitals and the behavioral health crisis center, appropriate hospitalizations and behavioral health crisis center admissions; (5)  Prioritize housing placements for participants; (6)  Begin participant treatment on psychiatric medications when appropriate; (7)  Actively pursue assisted community treatment orders when appropriate; (8)  Continue services if a participant is admitted to the Hawaii state hospital; (9)  Engage social work interns and advanced practice registered nurse students to expand service capacity for the target population; (10)  Bill third-party payors, medicare, or medicaid, as appropriate for services; and (11)  Be staffed as follows: (A)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) human services professional V, who shall serve as the clinical supervisor; (B)  A one-half full-time equivalent (0.5 FTE) psychiatrist; (C)  Five full-time equivalent (5.0 FTE) human services professionals or social workers; (D)  A one-half full-time equivalent (0.5 FTE) registered nurse; (E)  A one-tenth full-time equivalent (0.1 FTE) epidemiologist, epidemiology specialist, or research statistician; and (F)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) program specialist. (d) The department of health shall collaborate with law enforcement agencies, courts, hospitals, providers who serve houseless individuals, mental health providers, and community stakeholders for the implementation of the pilot program. (e) The adult mental health division of the department of health shall submit a report on the intensive mobile team pilot program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028.  Each report shall include any proposed legislation and progress updates on the aggregate numbers of: (1)  Participant arrests; (2)  Participants requiring an emergency examination and hospitalization; (3)  Participants placed into housing; (4)  Participants started on medications; (5)  Participants hospitalized at the Hawaii state hospital; (6)  Participants reconnected with family; and (7)  Assisted community treatment orders pursued and granted. (f)  The intensive mobile team pilot program shall be dissolved on June 30, 2028. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation of the intensive mobile team pilot program, including the establishment of eight and one-tenth full-time equivalent (8.1 FTE) positions, that shall be exempt from chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, operating costs, and equipment pursuant to this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.